Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1216.
do enact as follows:AB1216,11Section 1. 20.145 (1) (g) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1216,2,10220.145 (1) (g) General program operations. (intro.) The amounts in the 3schedule for general program operations, including organizational support services 4and, oversight of care management organizations, and operation of a state-based 5exchange under s. 601.59, and for transferring to the appropriation account under 6s. 20.435 (4) (kv) the amount allocated by the commissioner of insurance. 7Notwithstanding s. 20.001 (3) (a), at the end of each fiscal year, the unencumbered 8balance in this appropriation account that exceeds 10 percent of that fiscal year’s 9expenditure under this appropriation shall lapse to the general fund. All of the 10following shall be credited to this appropriation account:AB1216,211Section 2. 20.145 (1) (g) 4. of the statutes is created to read:AB1216,2,121220.145 (1) (g) 4. All moneys received under s. 601.59.AB1216,313Section 3. 601.59 of the statutes is created to read:AB1216,2,1414601.59 State-based exchange. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB1216,2,1515(a) “Exchange” has the meaning given in 45 CFR 155.20.AB1216,3,216(b) “State-based exchange on the federal platform” means an exchange that is 1described in and meets the requirements of 45 CFR 155.200 (f) and is approved by 2the federal secretary of health and human services under 45 CFR 155.106.AB1216,3,63(c) “State-based exchange without the federal platform” means an exchange, 4other than one described in 45 CFR 155.200 (f), that performs all the functions 5described in 45 CFR 155.200 (a) and is approved by the federal secretary of health 6and human services under 45 CFR 155.106.AB1216,3,147(2) Establishment and operation of state-based exchange. The 8commissioner shall establish and operate an exchange that, by no later than plan 9year 2029, is a state-based exchange on the federal platform and then, by no later 10than plan year 2030, transitions to a state-based exchange without the federal 11platform. The commissioner shall develop procedures to address the transition 12from the state-based exchange on the federal platform to the state-based exchange 13without the federal platform, including the circumstances that shall be met in order 14for the transition to occur.AB1216,3,1715(3) Agreement with federal government. The commissioner may enter 16into any agreement with the federal government necessary to facilitate the 17implementation of this section.AB1216,3,2318(4) User fees. The commissioner shall impose a user fee, as authorized 19under 45 CFR 155.160 (b) (1), on each insurer that offers a health plan through the 20state-based exchange on the federal platform or the state-based exchange without 21the federal platform. The user fee shall be applied at one of the following rates on 22the total monthly premiums charged by an insurer for each policy under the plan for 23which enrollment is through the exchange:AB1216,4,21(a) For any plan year for which the commissioner operates a state-based 2exchange on the federal platform, the rate is 0.5 percent.AB1216,4,63(b) For the first 2 plan years for which the commissioner operates a state-4based exchange without the federal platform, the rate is equal to the user fee rate 5the federal department of health and human services specifies under 45 CFR 6156.50 (c) (1) for the federally facilitated exchanges for the applicable plan year.AB1216,4,97(c) Beginning with the 3rd plan year for which the commissioner operates a 8state-based exchange without the federal platform and for each plan year 9thereafter, the rate shall be set by the commissioner by rule.AB1216,4,1010